Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 2. Trial

Cross references. —

As to transfer from the county for trial, see Rule 21, W.R. Cr. P.

As to trial by the jury or by the court, see Rule 23, W.R. Cr. P.

Imprisonment of accused for another offense does not excuse delay in prosecution.

State v. Keefe, 17 Wyo. 227, 98 P. 122,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1908).

Purpose of jury view

is to help it understand and comprehend the evidence which has already been presented, and not to take new evidence. Lansing v. State, 669 P.2d 923,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 365

(Wyo. 1983).

Jury view within discretion of court. —

The decision whether or not to allow the jury to view the scene is within the sound discretion of the trial court. Lansing v. State, 669 P.2d 923,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 365

(Wyo. 1983).

It is appropriate for court to reserve ruling on request to view premises.

Ordinarily the court would not know if a view was appropriate until it heard the evidence. Eckert v. State, 680 P.2d 478,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1984).

Sheriff or other person appointed may speak to jury

concerning the case outside of the court's presence in order to point out the premises. Jenkins v. State, 22 Wyo. 34, 134 P. 260,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(1913), rehearing denied, 22 Wyo. 78, 135 P. 749 (1913) (decided under prior law).

Disqualification of sheriff for bias must be proved. —

Statement by defendant's counsel, in making an objection to appointment of sheriff to accompany jury when it viewed premises, that the sheriff was prejudiced is not sufficient to disqualify him in absence of any showing of bias or prejudice on his part, and his appointment was not error. Jenkins v. State, 22 Wyo. 34, 134 P. 260,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(1913), rehearing denied, 22 Wyo. 78, 135 P. 749 (1913) (decided under prior law).

It is not necessary that court stenographer be present during view of premises —

by the jury to report all that was said. Jenkins v. State, 22 Wyo. 34, 134 P. 260,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 22 Wyo. 34, 135 P. 749,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1913).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

75 Am. Jur. 2d Trial § 1 et seq.

Necessity for presence of judge at view by jury in criminal case, 47 ALR2d 1227.

Objections and exceptions with respect to absence of judge at view by jury in criminal case, 47 ALR2d 1227.

Unauthorized view of premises by juror or jury in criminal case as ground for new trial, 58 ALR2d 1147.

Antagonistic defenses as grounds for separate trials of codefendants in criminal case, 82 ALR3d 245.

Right of defendants in prosecution for criminal conspiracy to separate trials, 82 ALR3d 366.

Sufficiency of courtroom facilities as affecting rights of accused, 85 ALR3d 918.

Unauthorized view of premises by juror or jury in criminal case as ground for reversal, new trial or mistrial, 50 ALR4th 995.

Exclusion of public from state criminal trial in order to preserve confidentiality of undercover witness, 54 ALR4th 1156.

Exclusion of public from state criminal trial by conducting trial or part thereof at other than regular place or time, 70 ALR4th 632.

Prosecutor's appeal in criminal case to racial, national or religious prejudice as ground for mistrial, new trial, reversal or vacation of sentence — modern cases, 70 ALR4th 664.

23A C.J.S. Criminal Law §§ 1142 to 1419.

§ 7-11-201.
Order of proceedings.

After the jury has been impaneled and sworn, the trial shall proceed in the following order:

The counsel for the state shall state the case of the prosecution, and may briefly state the evidence by which he expects to sustain it;

The defendant or his counsel may then state his defense and may briefly state the evidence he expects to offer in support of it, or may wait until the evidence on the part of the state is closed;

The state shall first produce its evidence; the defendant will then produce his evidence;

The state will then be confined to rebutting evidence unless the court, for good reasons, in furtherance of justice, shall permit it to offer evidence in chief;

When the evidence is concluded, either party may request instructions to the jury on the points of law, which shall be given or refused by the court. The instructions shall be reduced to writing;

Before the argument of the case is begun, the court shall immediately, and before proceeding with other business, charge the jury. The charge shall be reduced to writing by the court, if either party requests it. No charge or instruction provided for in this section, when written or given, shall be orally qualified, modified or explained to the jury by the court. All written charges and instructions, shall be taken by the jury in their retirement and returned with their verdict into court, and shall remain on file with the papers of the case;

When the evidence is concluded, and the charge given by the court, unless the case is submitted without argument, the counsel for the state shall commence, the defendant or his counsel follow, and the counsel for the state shall conclude the argument to the jury.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 140; R.S. 1887, § 3300; Laws 1893, ch. 27, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 5371; C.S. 1910, § 6235; C.S. 1920, § 7532; R.S. 1931, § 33-902; C.S. 1945, § 10-1301; W.S. 1957, § 7-228; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to continuances, see chapter 9 of title 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Court's determination to permit witnesses to testify out of order is discretionary matter

with the court and should not be disturbed on appeal, unless it can be clearly shown that the trial court abused its discretion. Shaffer v. State, 640 P.2d 88,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1982).

Refusal to hold witness not abuse of discretion. —

Defendant's due process rights were not violated by trial court's denial of his request to hold witness subject to subpoena where the court was attempting to expedite trial by requiring defendant to finish questioning witness during cross-examination and defendant had not specifically named witness on his witness list nor subpoenaed witness. Sutherland v. State, 944 P.2d 1157,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1997).

Party resisting taking witness out of turn must demonstrateprejudice. —

The party who resists taking a witness out of turn has the burden to demonstrate that he has been prejudiced and that the trial judge has abused his discretion. Shaffer v. State, 640 P.2d 88,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1982).

Rebuttal permitted. —

See Mortimore v. State, 24 Wyo. 452, 161 P. 766,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1916).

Testimony offered during rebuttal which might have been admissible during the prosecution's case in chief, which is accepted as part of the case in chief, and to which the defendant is allowed surrebuttal, is not an abuse of discretion. Chapman v. State, 638 P.2d 1280,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 284

(Wyo. 1982).

Surrebuttal evidence properly excluded. —

While it is true that new facts brought out on rebuttal may properly be met by surrebuttal evidence, that rule does not permit surrebuttal merely to supply evidence which could have been given in chief or to cumulate additional evidence or to fortify evidence already given, or to supplement such evidence because it has been impeached upon rebuttal. Janski v. State, 538 P.2d 271,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1975).

Where facts in rebuttal were no part of the state's case but only designed to meet defendant's defense, and where neither of the state's rebuttal witnesses were new witnesses but had been called by the defendant himself during his case and could have then been impeached by the surrebuttal witnesses proposed during defendant's case and as a matter of fact were called by defendant to lay the groundwork for that purpose, it was discretionary with the court as to whether to allow surrebuttal. Janski v. State, 538 P.2d 271,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1975).

Refusal of the court, in a prosecution for homicide, to permit defendant to explain certain statements alleged to have been made by him, introduced in evidence in rebuttal, was not an abuse of discretion. Keffer v. State, 12 Wyo. 49, 73 P. 556,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1903).

Reopening case permitted. —

Permitting state, after defense had rested, to introduce evidence that was properly part of its case in chief was not abuse of discretion, where defendant was not denied right to meet evidence by reopening case, in view of subsection (a)(iv) of this section. Strand v. State, 36 Wyo. 78, 252 P. 1030,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1927).

Federal and state instruction procedure distinguished. —

In the federal system the court may give such charge to the jury as it sees fit, together with such comment, explanation, modification or change as it may desire. Under such a procedure, it is understandable why objection must be made following the giving of the charge. But under the state procedure the parties know beforehand exactly what instructions will be given, and in what language, as well as which of the requested instructions will be refused. Being so apprised, the parties are in a position to make objections to the court's rulings before the instructions are given the jury, setting forth with particularity their reasons, and the rulings of the court then made become final with no exceptions being necessary. Shoemaker v. State, 444 P.2d 309,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1968).

Effect of Rule 51, W.R.C.P. —

Subsection (vi) of this section requires the court to charge the jury in writing if either party requests it, and when so written the court may not orally qualify, modify or in any manner explain the same to the jury. Rule 51, W.R.C.P., requires the instruction to be in writing and signed by the judge. Such rule does not otherwise change, supersede or modify the provisions of this section. Shoemaker v. State, 444 P.2d 309,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1968). See Rule 30 W.R. Cr. P.

Correct instruction must be presented. —

A party desiring an instruction on any point of law must present to the court a correct instruction either orally or in writing, and not merely request court to instruct the jury, so that, in absence of presentation of instruction correctly defining reasonable doubt, the court itself was not required to define it. Smith v. State, 17 Wyo. 481, 101 P. 847,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1909).

And better practice is to write requested instructions. —

While, under this section, it is not necessary to reduce requested instructions to writing unless the request is made, it is the better practice to do so and the uniform practice in this state. Smith v. State, 17 Wyo. 481, 101 P. 847,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1909).

Request for written charge necessary. —

It is not obligatory that the charge be in writing unless such a request is made. Curran v. State, 12 Wyo. 553, 76 P. 577,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1904).

Oral instructions given contrary to statute are not reversible error

if instructions are proper and do not injure accused, and this is especially true where instructions were taken down by official stenographer, or were reduced to writing immediately after they were given. State v. Carroll, 52 Wyo. 29, 69 P.2d 542,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1937).

Court may refuse incorrect instructions. —

Under this section particular instructions must generally be requested and, unless correct, it is proper for the court to refuse to give them. State v. Catellier, 63 Wyo. 123, 179 P.2d 203,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1947).

Instruction on circumstantial evidence should be given withoutrequest. —

Where circumstantial evidence is wholly relied on for conviction, trial court should instruct on the law regarding such evidence, whether requested to do so or not, such a charge being fundamental to defendant's having fair trial guaranteed him by the constitution and laws. Gardner v. State, 27 Wyo. 316, 196 P. 750,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1921).

Failure to give instruction must be prejudicial for reversal.—

To justify reversal of conviction for failure to give an instruction on circumstantial evidence wholly relied on for conviction, where it appears that it was otherwise a fair trial, such failure of the trial court should be found to have been prejudicial to defendant. Gardner v. State, 27 Wyo. 316, 196 P. 750,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1921).

As must refusal to give instruction. —

Refusal of instruction to acquit if any of jury had reasonable doubt of defendant's guilt was not prejudicial error, in view of instructions given and evidence. State v. Flory, 40 Wyo. 184, 276 P. 458,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1929).

No error where instruction not asked. —

Where no instruction defining robbery was asked, failure to give such instruction was not prejudicial. Harris v. State, 34 Wyo. 175, 242 P. 411,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1926).

No error was committed by failure to instruct on circumstantial evidence, where no such instruction was asked. Brown v. State, 37 Wyo. 155, 259 P. 810,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1927).

Failure to instruct on circumstantial evidence was not error, where such instructions were not requested. Cameron v. State, 38 Wyo. 140, 265 P. 25,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1928).

Failure to reread instructions given at the beginning of trial.—

Where a trial court gave part of the jury instructions at the beginning of defendant's criminal trial and gave the remaining instructions after the trial but prior to the jury's deliberations, such complied with this section, and it was not plain error for the trial court to fail to reread the earlier given instructions at the close of trial. Urbigkit v. State, 2003 WY 57, 67 P.3d 1207,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2003).

Extra information held not modification of instruction. —

Where in homicide case jury returned to the courtroom asking additional information, all counsel being present, concerning the meaning of life imprisonment, and whether any pardon, commutation of sentence or parole could reduce it, court's instruction on life imprisonment, and statement concerning pardons could not be considered modification of the instruction read to the jury, and did not prejudice the defendant. State v. Carroll, 52 Wyo. 29, 69 P.2d 542,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1937).

Proper instruction on possibility of reduction of sentence.—

Where jury asks information as to possibility of sentence being reduced, or otherwise changed, which is answered fairly and without suggestion of what penalty should be imposed, court should advise that they should not speculate upon what might happen after verdict. State v. Carroll, 52 Wyo. 29, 69 P.2d 542,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1937).

Purpose of closing arguments

is for counsel to explain the significance of the evidence and how it should be viewed. Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (U.S. 1982).

And counsel may present logical inferences from evidence. —

In closing, prosecutors, just like any other counsel, may not only comment on the evidence before the jury but also present inferences to the jury which he argues logically follow from the evidence. Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (U.S. 1982).

State opens and closes argument when defendant pleads guilty.—

In a prosecution for first-degree murder, the procedure prescribed by this section governs and the state was entitled to open and close the argument, even though defendant pleads guilty. Pixley v. State, 406 P.2d 662,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 1965).

Applied

in

Murdica v. State, 22 Wyo. 196, 137 P. 574,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1913); Wright v. State, 466 P.2d 1014,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1970); Lowseth v. State, 875 P.2d 725,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

In re Contempt Order Issued Against Anderson, 765 P.2d 933,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1988); McAdams v. State, 2003 WY 104, 75 P.3d 665,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “The Entrapment Defense — The Determination of Predisposition. Janski v. State, 538 P.2d 271,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1975),” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 265 (1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Accused's identity with one previously convicted, 11 ALR2d 870.

Interrogation or poll of jurors, during trial, as to whether they have read newspaper articles pertaining to alleged crime or the trial, 15 ALR2d 1152.

Procedure to be followed where jury requests information as to possibility of pardon or parole from sentence imposed, 35 ALR2d 769.

Exclusion of public during criminal trial, 48 ALR2d 1436.

Right to jury trial as violated by consolidated trial upon several indictments and informations, over objection of the accused, 59 ALR2d 841.

Presence of alternate juror in jury room, 84 ALR2d 1288.

Indoctrination by court of persons summoned for jury service, 89 ALR2d 197.

Additional instruction to jury, in accused's absence, after submission of felony case, 94 ALR2d 270.

Prejudicial effect, in criminal case, of communications between witnesses and jurors, 9 ALR3d 1275.

Propriety under Griffin v. California and prejudicial effect of the giving of an unrequested instruction that no inferences against accused should be drawn from his failure to testify, 18 ALR3d 1335.

Whether violation of federal constitutional rule (Griffin v. California) prohibiting adverse comment by prosecutor or court upon accused's failure to testify constitutes reversible or harmless error, 24 ALR3d 1093, 32 ALR4th 774.

Prejudicial effect of holding accused in contempt of court in presence of jury, 29 ALR3d 1399.

Permitting documents or tape recordings containing confessions or incriminating evidence to be taken to jury room, 37 ALR3d 238.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of placing jury in charge of officer who is a witness in the case, 38 ALR3d 1012.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of prosecutor's argument to jury indicating his belief or knowledge as to guilt of accused — modern cases, 88 ALR3d 449.

Disruptive conduct of accused in presence of jury as ground for mistrial or discharge of jury, 89 ALR3d 960.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of sending written instructions with retiring jury in criminal case, 91 ALR3d 382.

Instruction in prosecution for rape or other sexual offense as to ease of making, or difficulty of defending against, such a charge, 92 ALR3d 866.

Prosecutor's reference in opening statement to matters not provable or which he does not attempt to prove as ground for relief, 16 ALR4th 810.

Modern status of rule regarding necessity of instruction on circumstantial evidence in criminal trial — state cases, 36 ALR4th 1046.

Postretirement out-of-court communications between jurors and trial judge as grounds for new trial or reversal in criminal case, 43 ALR4th 410.

Propriety of trial court order limiting time for opening or closing argument in criminal case — state cases, 71 ALR4th 200.

Instructions in state criminal case in which defendant pleads insanity as to hospital confinement in event of acquittal, 81 ALR4th 659.

Negative characterization or description of defendant, by prosecutor during summation of criminal trial, as ground for reversal, new trial or mistrial—modern cases, 88 ALR4th 8.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of counsel's negative characterization or description of witness during summation of criminal trial—modern cases, 88 ALR4th 209.

Taking and use of trial notes by jury, 36 ALR5th 255.

Right of defendant in prosecution for perjury to have the “two witnesses, or one witness and corroborating circumstances,” rule included in charge to jury — state cases, 41 ALR5th 1.

Propriety of lesser included offense charge to jury in federal criminal case — general principles, 100 ALR Fed 481.

§ 7-11-202.
Presence of defendant.

Except as otherwise provided by this section, the defendant shall be present at the arraignment, at every stage of the trial, including the impaneling of the jury, and the return of the verdict and at the imposition of sentence. In prosecution for offenses not punishable by death, the defendant’s voluntary absence after the trial has been commenced in his presence shall not prevent continuing the trial to and including the return of the verdict. A corporation may appear by counsel for all purposes. In prosecutions of all misdemeanor cases, the court, with the written consent of the defendant, may permit arraignment, plea, and imposition of sentence in a defendant’s absence. The defendant’s presence is not required at a reduction of sentence hearing.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 141; R.S. 1887, § 3301; R.S. 1899, § 5372; C.S. 1910, § 6236; C.S. 1920, § 7533; R.S. 1931, § 33-903; C.S. 1945, § 10-1302; W.S. 1957, § 7-229; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional right of accused to defend, see art. 1, § 10, Wyo. Const.

As to procedure in regard to presence of defendant, see Rule 43, W.R. Cr. P.

Harmless error.

District court violated defendant’s right to be present when it communicated ex parte with a juror and, in response to a note, instructed her on how she was to conduct herself as a juror. The error was harmless as the instruction the court gave was legally correct, one that the parties had agreed upon, and one that had already been given to the jury. Wall v. State, 2019 WY 2, 432 P.3d 516,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2019).

Bench conferences. —

Defendant waived her right to be present at bench conferences involving prospective jurors, where both she and her counsel acquiesced in her absence while defense counsel represented her interests for that part of trial. Campbell v. State, 999 P.2d 649,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2000).

Defendant was not prejudiced by his absence at a conference between the judge, counsel, and a juror where the defendant could not show that his presence would have caused his counsel to take different action than he did. Skinner v. State, 2001 WY 102, 33 P.3d 758,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2001), cert. denied, 535 U.S. 994, 122 S. Ct. 1554, 152 L. Ed. 2d 477, 2002 U.S. LEXIS 2469 (U.S. 2002).

In a defendant's murder case, the defendant's right to be present was not violated, where (1) there was no indication that the defendant's absence from a conference on an objection was anything but voluntary, (2) the absence was for a brief period of time, (3) there was no indication that the defendant possessed any special information on the question that his counsel did not, and (4) there was no indication that the defendant's presence could have altered the judge's decision on the objection in any way. Belden v. State, 2003 WY 89, 73 P.3d 1041,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. Aug. 26, 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 1165, 124 S. Ct. 1179, 157 L. Ed. 2d 1212, 2004 U.S. LEXIS 898 (U.S. 2004).

Continuance hearing. —

The constitutional guarantee that an accused has the right to be present during every stage of the criminal proceeding that is critical to its outcome if his presence would contribute to the fairness of the procedure has been embodied into this section and Wyo. R. Crim. P. 43(a) but in neither of these laws is it mandated that a defendant be present at a continuance hearing. Hauck v. State, 2001 WY 119, 36 P.3d 597,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 2001).

Defendant's
right to a speedy trial was not violated because defendant was not
substantially prejudiced by a delay; moreover, he did not object
to
the delay, and he was not entitled to be personally present a
hearing
during which a continuance was ordered. The delay due to
the court's
busy docket amounted to only 56 days from the original
trial date
to the actual trial date. Vargas v. State, 2014 WY 53, 322 P.3d 1282,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2014).

Presence at sentencing. —

Because the inmate, convicted of battery against a household member, was not present at sentencing as required by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-11-202

and Wyo. R. Crim. P. 43, the court remanded the case for re-sentencing; a defendant may not waive his right to be present at sentencing. Abeyta v. State, 2003 WY 136, 78 P.3d 664,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 2003).

Hearing to modify probation terms. —

Defendant's constitutional rights were not violated when district court denied requests to modify terms of his probation or to discharge him from probation without his presence at the hearing; defendant's motions were essentially requests for a sentence reduction, and under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-11-202

and Wyo. R. Crim. P. 43(c), he was not entitled to be present at the hearing on his motions.
Demillard v. State, 2008 WY 93, 190 P.3d 128,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2008).

Affirmance of conviction. —

Where arraignment, trial and sentencing had already occurred, the defendant was not entitled to be present when the trial court entered the written order acknowledging the supreme court's decision affirming the underlying conviction. Smith v. Wyoming, 985 P.2d 961,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1999).

Ineffective assistance not proved. —

Defendant failed to show that his defense counsel was ineffective in allowing defendant to absent himself from the peremptory challenge portion of jury selection; on the contrary, the record showed that defense counsel systematically included the defendant in the jury evaluation and selection process and the record was devoid of any suggestion of defense counsel wanting to keep defendant out of chambers. Gleason v. State, 2002 WY 161, 57 P.3d 332,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 2002).

Harmless error in jury instruction. —

Even though the trial court erred in submitting an “Allen-type” instruction to the jury outside the presence of defendant and his counsel, the error was harmless because the instruction did not contain prohibited new information, was not coercive, and specifically called the jury's attention to previous instructions on the presumption of innocence and the state's burden of proof. Seeley v. State, 959 P.2d 170,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1998).

Harmless error in considering jury question. —

When defendant was not present while the trial court considered a question from the jury, no reversible error was committed under this section because defense counsel interposed no objection to his client's absence, and, if any error was committed, that error was harmless. Johnson v. State, 2003 WY 9, 61 P.3d 1234,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. Feb. 18, 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 841, 124 S. Ct. 108, 157 L. Ed. 2d 74, 2003 U.S. LEXIS 5710 (U.S. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Exclusion or absence of defendant, pending trial of criminal case, from courtroom, or from conference between court and attorneys, during argument on question of law, 85 ALR2d 1111.

Necessity and content of instructions to jury respecting reasons for or inferences from accused's absence from state criminal trial, 31 ALR4th 676.

Failure or refusal of state court judge to have record made of bench conference with counsel in criminal proceeding, 31 ALR5th 704.

§ 7-11-203.
Dismissal for unnecessary delay.

If there is unnecessary delay in presenting the charge to a grand jury or in filing an information against a defendant who has been held to answer to the district court, or if there is unnecessary delay in bringing a defendant to trial, the court may dismiss the indictment, information or complaint.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 150; R.S. 1887, § 3311; R.S. 1899, § 5382; C.S. 1910, § 6246; C.S. 1920, § 7543; R.S. 1931, § 33-913; C.S. 1945, § 10-1312; W.S. 1957, § 7-234; W.S. 1957, § 7-11-207; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to grand jury, see chapter 5 of this title.

Section constitutes legislative declaration of “reasonabledelay.” —

This section makes effective art. 1, § 10, Wyo. Const., guaranteeing a speedy trial, and constitutes a legislative declaration of what is a “reasonable delay.” State v. Keefe, 17 Wyo. 227, 98 P. 122,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1908).

But subject now covered by rule of court. —

This section was interpreted as making effective
art. 1, § 10, Wyo. Const., and constituted a legislative declaration of what is a prejudicial delay. As of February 11, 1969, this statute was superseded by Rule 45, W.R. Cr. P., which rule is the same as
Rule 48, Fed. R. Crim. P.Boggs v. State, 484 P.2d 711,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1971) (delay in instituting proceedings not prejudicial) (decided prior to 1987 revision of this title).

Wyoming has no statute of limitations as to the commencement of criminal prosecutions.

Boggs v. State, 484 P.2d 711,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1971).

No prejudice from delay shown. —

The progress of a case through the judicial system from filing the information to trial was 181 days and more than half of this 181 days was attributable to the defendant, who did not vigorously assert his right to a speedy trial and, although he had the benefit of counsel, never pressed for an earlier setting. In fact, the defendant did not show in writing how a delay might prejudice his defense. Thus, he showed no prejudice caused by the delay. Roderick v. State, 858 P.2d 538,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. Sept. 16, 1993).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Gibson v. Cornwell, 14 Wyo. 526, 85 P. 977,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(1906); City of Sheridan v. Cadle, 24 Wyo. 293, 157 P. 892,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(1916); State v. Hall, 27 Wyo. 224, 194 P. 476,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1921); State v. Peterson, 27 Wyo. 185, 194 P. 342,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 33

, 13 A.L.R. 1284 (1920); State v. Butler, 40 Wyo. 404, 278 P. 563,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(1929).

Law reviews. —

For note, “The Obligation of Securing a Speedy Trial,” see 11 Wyo. L.J. 44.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Loss of jurisdiction by delay in imposing sentence, 98 ALR3d 605.

Application of speedy trial statute to dismissal or other termination of prior indictment or information and bringing of new indictment or information, 39 ALR4th 899.

Effect of Speedy Trial Act provision (18 USC § 3161(c)(2)) that unless defendant consents in writing to contrary, trial may not commence less than 30 days from date on which defendant first appears through counsel or expressly waives counsel or elects to proceed pro se, 71 ALR Fed 415.

§ 7-11-204.
Applicability of civil procedure provisions and rules.

To the extent practicable and when not otherwise specifically provided, procedures relating to conduct of the jury, admonitions of the court and the manner of returning verdicts, shall be governed by the Wyoming Code of Civil Procedure and the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 153; R.S. 1887, § 3314; R.S. 1899, § 5385; C.S. 1910, § 6249; C.S. 1920, § 7546; R.S. 1931, § 33-1001; C.S. 1945, § 10-1315; W.S. 1957, § 7-237; W.S. 1977, § 7-11-210; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to conduct of trial and verdict in civil cases, see §

1-11-201

et seq.

As to procedure relating to trials, see Rules 38 through 53, W.R.C.P.

Separation of jury. —

See §

7-11-206

and notes thereto.

Application of Rule 51, W.R.C.P. —

See Shoemaker v. State, 444 P.2d 309,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1968) (decided prior to adoption of Rules of Criminal Procedure).

Rule 51, W.R.C.P., is made applicable to criminal proceedings by Rule 30, W.R. Cr. P., as to instructions to juries and objections thereto. Bentley v. State, 502 P.2d 203,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 279

(Wyo. 1972).

Applied

in

State v. Hambrick, 65 Wyo. 1, 196 P.2d 661,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1948); Heywood v. State, 2007 WY 149, 170 P.3d 1227,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Sept. 19, 2007).

Cited

in

Nicholson v. State, 18 Wyo. 298, 106 P. 929,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1910); Pixley v. State, 406 P.2d 662,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 1965); Romo v. State, 500 P.2d 678,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Separation of jury in criminal case; waiver of objection to separation, 21 ALR2d 1088.

Separation of jurors permitted to attend theater or the like during course of criminal trials as ground for mistrial, new trial or reversal, 33 ALR2d 847.

Communication between court officials or attendants and jurors in criminal trial as ground for mistrial or reversal — post-Parker cases, 35 ALR4th 890.

§ 7-11-205.
Discharge of jury before verdict without prejudice.

If a jury is discharged for any of the following reasons before reaching a verdict, the discharge shall be without prejudice to the prosecution:

Sickness of a juror or other accident or calamity requiring discharge of the jury;

Failure of the jury to return a verdict; or

Dismissal of the proceeding due to a failure of the complaint, information or indictment to properly charge the offense.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 154; R.S. 1887, § 3315; R.S. 1899, § 5386; C.S. 1910, § 6250; C.S. 1920, § 7547; R.S. 1931, § 33-1002; C.S. 1945, § 10-1316; W.S. 1957, § 7-238; W.S. 1977, § 7-11-211; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Discharge of jury when no agreement. —

Where, after reasonable time for deliberation has been allowed, a verdict has not been agreed upon and there is no probability of agreement, court may properly discharge jury without defendant's consent, without prejudice to future prosecution. Hovey v. Sheffner, 16 Wyo. 254, 93 P. 305,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1908).

If jury cannot agree on verdict, there is no bar to subsequent prosecution

for the same offense before a different jury. Jones v. State, 580 P.2d 1150,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1978).

Discharge subject to judge's sound discretion. —

Where “manifest necessity” to discharge a jury from giving any verdict is demonstrated, the public's interest in fair trials designed to end in just judgments outweighs a defendant's valued right to have his trial completed by a particular tribunal, as well as his interest in avoiding retrial for the same offense, and the sole limitation restraining a trial court in its determination that a retrial is “manifestly necessary” is that such decision is committed to the trial judge's “sound discretion.” Peterson v. State, 586 P.2d 144,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1978), overruled, Crozier v. State, 723 P.2d 42,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 595

(Wyo. 1986).

But societal interest in complete opportunity to convict. —

A trial judge may discharge a genuinely deadlocked jury and require the defendant to submit to a second trial, as this accords recognition to society's interest in giving the prosecution one complete opportunity to convict those who have violated its laws. Peterson v. State, 586 P.2d 144,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1978), overruled, Crozier v. State, 723 P.2d 42,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 595

(Wyo. 1986).

Entry of reasons for discharge upon record. —

Where the transcript of a colloquy between the trial judge and jury foreman indicates that the jury had reached a state of impasse, and it was upon that basis that the trial judge discharged them, that record entry is a substantial fulfillment of the statutory requirements of this section that the reasons for discharge of the jury be entered upon the journal. Peterson v. State, 586 P.2d 144,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1978), overruled on other grounds, 723 P.2d 42,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 595

(Wyo. 1986) (decided prior to 1987 revision of this title).

Cited

in

Wardell v. McMillan, 844 P.2d 1052,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1992).